Hawaii, session 2026, SB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to propose an amendment to article I, of the Hawaii State Constitution to establish the constitutional right of the people, including present and future generations, to clean water and air, a healthful environment and climate, healthy native ecosystems, and beaches, that shall be protected and shall not be infringed. This proposed amendment reflects the rooted traditions and collective cultural conscience of the State's people, and exemplifies the fundamental Native Hawaiian notion of Aloha Aina, which translates to "love of the land" and is central to Native Hawaiian values and beliefs.  The amendment will complement existing constitutional provisions and reinforce protections of human health, natural and cultural values, and the environment, all of which are essential to the sustenance of the State as well as the intrinsic beauty of its islands that attract admiration from peoples all over the world. SECTION 2. Article I of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "ENVIRONMENTAL RIGHTS Section   . The inherent and inalienable rights of the people, including present and future generations, to clean water and air, a healthful environment and climate, healthy native ecosystems and beaches, shall be protected and shall not be infringed." SECTION 3. The question to be printed on the ballot shall be as follows: "Shall the Hawaii State Constitution be amended to ensure the inherent and inalienable right of the people, including present and future generations, to clean water and air, a healthful environment and climate, healthy native ecosystems, and beaches, shall be protected and shall not be infringed?" SECTION 4. New constitutional material is underscored. SECTION 5. This amendment shall take effect upon compliance with article XVII, section 3, of the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.